Washington statutes.
RCW 42.24.140

Advancements for travel expenses—Provision to assure repayment.

To protect the municipal corporation or political subdivision from any losses on account of advances made as provided in RCW 42.24.120 through 42.24.160, the municipal corporation or political subdivision shall have a prior lien against and a right to withhold any and all funds payable or to become payable by the municipal corporation or political subdivision to such officer or employee to whom such advance has been given, as provided in RCW 42.24.120 through 42.24.160, up to the amount of such advance and interest at the rate of ten percent per annum, until such time as repayment or justification has been made. No advance of any kind may be made to any officer or employee under RCW 42.24.120 through 42.24.160, at any time when he or she is delinquent in accounting for or repaying a prior advance under RCW 42.24.120 through 42.24.160.

[ 2012 c 117 s 119; 1969 c 74 s 3.]